Hawaii statutes.
§91-6 Petition for adoption, amendment or
repeal of rules. Any interested person may petition an agency requesting
the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any rule stating reasons therefor. Each
agency shall adopt rules prescribing the form for the petitions and the
procedure for their submission, consideration, and disposition. Upon
submission of the petition, the agency shall within thirty days either deny the
petition in writing, stating its reasons for the denial or initiate proceedings
in accordance with section 91-3. [L 1961, c 103, §6; Supp, §6C-6; HRS §91-6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next